Utah statutes.
19-6-906.   Decontamination standards -- Specialist certification standards
-- Rulemaking.
(1)  The Department of Health shall make rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, in consultation with the local health
departments and the Department of Environmental Quality, to establish:
(a)  decontamination and sampling standards and best management practices for
the inspection and decontamination of property and the disposal of
contaminated debris under this part;
(b)  appropriate methods for the testing of buildings and interior surfaces,
and furnishings, soil, and septic tanks for contamination; and
(c)  when testing for contamination may be required.
(2)  The Department of Environmental Quality Solid and Hazardous Waste Control
Board shall make rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, in consultation with the Department of Health and local health
departments, to establish within the Department of Environmental Quality
Division of Environmental Response and Remediation:
(a)  certification standards for any private person, firm, or entity involved
in the decontamination of contaminated property; and
(b)  a process for revoking the certification of a decontamination specialist
who fails to maintain the certification standards.
(3)  All rules made under this part shall be consistent with other state and
federal requirements.
(4)  The board has authority to enforce the provisions under Subsection (2).
